Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.070

Commission established—Membership—Qualifications. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5051.SL) ***

(1) The state *nursing care quality assurance commission is established, consisting of fifteen members to be appointed by the governor to four-year terms. The governor shall consider nursing members who are recommended for appointment by the appropriate professional associations in the state. No person may serve as a member of the *commission for more than two consecutive full terms.

(2) There must be seven registered nurse members, two advanced registered nurse practitioner members, three licensed practical nurse members, and three public members on the *commission. Each member of the *commission must be a resident of this state.

(3)(a) Registered nurse members of the *commission must:

(i) Be licensed as registered nurses under this chapter; and

(ii) Have had at least three years' experience in the active practice of nursing and have been engaged in that practice within two years of appointment.

(b) In addition:

(i) At least one member must be on the faculty at a four-year university nursing program;

(ii) At least one member must be on the faculty at a two-year community college nursing program;

(iii) At least two members must be staff nurses providing direct patient care; and

(iv) At least one member must be a nurse manager or a nurse executive.

(4) Advanced registered nurse practitioner members of the *commission must:

(a) Be licensed as advanced registered nurse practitioners under this chapter; and

(b) Have had at least three years' experience in the active practice of advanced registered nursing and have been engaged in that practice within two years of appointment.

(5) Licensed practical nurse members of the *commission must:

(a) Be licensed as licensed practical nurses under this chapter; and

(b) Have had at least three years' actual experience as a licensed practical nurse and have been engaged in practice as a practical nurse within two years of appointment.

(6) Public members of the *commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the *commission, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the *commission.

In appointing the initial members of the *commission, it is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent possible, the governor appoint the existing members of the board of nursing and the board of practical nursing repealed under chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. The governor may appoint initial members of the *commission to staggered terms of from one to four years. Thereafter, all members shall be appointed to full four-year terms. Members of the *commission hold office until their successors are appointed.

When the secretary appoints pro tem members, reasonable efforts shall be made to ensure that at least one pro tem member is a registered nurse who is currently practicing and, in addition to meeting other minimum qualifications, has graduated from an associate or baccalaureate nursing program within three years of appointment.

[2022 c 240 s 32; 2005 c 17 s 1; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 407.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

PDFRCW 18.79.070

Board of nursing established—Membership—Qualifications. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5051.SL) ***

(1) The state board [of nursing] is established, consisting of fifteen members to be appointed by the governor to four-year terms. The governor shall consider nursing members who are recommended for appointment by the appropriate professional associations in the state. No person may serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive full terms.

(2) There must be seven registered nurse members, two advanced practice registered nurse members, three licensed practical nurse members, and three public members on the board. Each member of the board must be a resident of this state.

(3)(a) Registered nurse members of the board must:

(i) Be licensed as registered nurses under this chapter; and

(ii) Have had at least three years' experience in the active practice of nursing and have been engaged in that practice within two years of appointment.

(b) In addition:

(i) At least one member must be on the faculty at a four-year university nursing program;

(ii) At least one member must be on the faculty at a two-year community college nursing program;

(iii) At least two members must be staff nurses providing direct patient care; and

(iv) At least one member must be a nurse manager or a nurse executive.

(4) Advanced practice registered nurse members of the board must:

(a) Be licensed as advanced practice registered nurses under this chapter; and

(b) Have had at least three years' experience in the active practice of advanced practice registered nursing and have been engaged in that practice within two years of appointment.

(5) Licensed practical nurse members of the board must:

(a) Be licensed as licensed practical nurses under this chapter; and

(b) Have had at least three years' actual experience as a licensed practical nurse and have been engaged in practice as a practical nurse within two years of appointment.

(6) Public members of the board may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the board, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the board.

Members of the board hold office until their successors are appointed.

When the secretary appoints pro tem members, reasonable efforts shall be made to ensure that at least one pro tem member is a registered nurse who is currently practicing and, in addition to meeting other minimum qualifications, has graduated from an associate or baccalaureate nursing program within three years of appointment.

[2024 c 239 s 5; 2022 c 240 s 32; 2005 c 17 s 1; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 407.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.